Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1633
Agreements with county, state, and federal governments; proration of costs; application of payments and contributions.

The district may enter into agreements with the State of Nebraska, the federal government, or the county or counties in which the district is located, whereby certain portions of the costs will be assumed and paid by any or all of such agencies and such payments or contributions shall be applied by the board of trustees to reduce such costs and assessments to the property owners of the district.

Laws 1957, c. 155, art. III, § 33, p. 539.